Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1120.26
Director of Communications; state or political subdivision; gifts, property; accept; purpose; procedure.

The Director of Communications is hereby authorized to receive gifts, contributions, property and equipment from public or private sources to be utilized in providing communications services, and to participate with the federal government in carrying out programs for communications services within the State of Nebraska. Whenever the federal government or any agency or officer thereof shall offer to the state, or through the state to any political subdivision thereof, communications services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way of gift, grant, or loan for purposes of communications system objectives, the state, acting through the Governor, or such political subdivision, acting with the consent of the Governor and through its executive officer or governing body, may accept such offer and upon such acceptance the Governor or executive officer or governing body of such political subdivision may authorize any officer of the state or such political subdivision to receive such services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds on behalf of the state or such political subdivision, and subject to the terms of the offer and rules and regulations, if any, of the agency making the offer.

Laws 1967, c. 572, § 12, p. 1884;

R.R.S.1943, § 81-1120.12;

Laws 1975, LB 427, § 17.